District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Uniform Special Deposits Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new chapter designation to read as
follows:
“29A. Uniform Special Deposits.”.
(b) A new Chapter 29A is added to read as follows:
“CHAPTER 29A. UNIFORM SPECIAL DEPOSITS.
“Sec.
“28-2951. Definitions.
“28-2952. Scope; choice of law; forum.
“28-2953. Variation by agreement or amendment.
“28-2954. Requirements for special deposit.
“28-2955. Permissible purpose.
“28-2956. Payment to beneficiary by bank.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“28-2957. Property interest of depositor or beneficiary
“28-2958. When creditor process enforceable against bank.
“28-2959. Injunction or similar relief.
“28-2960. Recoupment or setoff.
“28-2961. Duties and liability of bank.
“28-2962. Term and termination.
“28-2963. Principles of law and equity.
“28-2964. Uniformity of application and construction.
“28-2965. Transitional provision.
“§ 28-2951. Definitions.
“For the purposes of this chapter, the term:
“(1) “Account agreement” means an agreement that:
“(A) Is in a record between a bank and one or more depositors;
“(B) May have one or more beneficiaries as additional parties; and
“(C) States the intention of the parties to establish a special deposit
governed by this chapter.
“(2) “Bank” means a person engaged in the business of banking and includes a
savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, and trust company. Each branch or
separate office of a bank is a separate bank for the purposes of this chapter.
“(3) “Beneficiary” means a person that:
“(A) Is identified as a beneficiary in an account agreement; or
“(B) If not identified as a beneficiary in an account agreement, may be
entitled to payment from a special deposit:
“(i) Under the account agreement; or
“(ii) On termination of the special deposit.
“(4) “Contingency” means an event or circumstance stated in an account
agreement that is not certain to occur but must occur before the bank is obligated to pay a
beneficiary.
“(5) “Creditor process” means attachment, garnishment, levy, notice of lien,
sequestration, or similar process issued by or on behalf of a creditor or other claimant.
“(6) “Depositor” means a person that establishes or funds a special deposit.
“(7) “Good faith” means honesty in fact and observance of reasonable
commercial standards of fair dealing.
“(8) “Knowledge” of a fact means:
“(A) With respect to a beneficiary, actual knowledge of the fact; or
“(B) With respect to a bank holding a special deposit:
“(i) Actual knowledge of the fact by an individual, if the bank:
“(I) Has established a reasonable routine for
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
communicating material information to the individual to whom the bank has assigned
responsibility for the special deposit; and
“(II) Maintains reasonable compliance with the routine; or
“(ii) If the bank has not established and maintained reasonable
compliance with a routine described in sub-subparagraph (i) of this subparagraph or otherwise
exercised due diligence, implied knowledge of the fact that would have come to the attention of
an individual to whom the bank has assigned responsibility for the special deposit.
“(9) “Obligated to pay a beneficiary” means a beneficiary is entitled under the
account agreement to receive from the bank a payment when:
“(A) A contingency has occurred; and
“(B) The bank has knowledge the contingency has occurred.
“(10) “Permissible purpose” means a governmental, regulatory, commercial,
charitable, or testamentary objective of the parties stated in an account agreement. The term
includes an objective to:
“(A) Hold funds:
“(i) In escrow, including for a purchase and sale, lease, buyback, or
other transaction;
“(ii) As a security deposit of a tenant;
“(iii) That may be distributed to a person as remuneration,
retirement or other benefit, or compensation under a judgment, consent decree, court order, or
other decision of a tribunal; or
“(iv) For distribution to a defined class of persons after
identification of the class members and their interest in the funds;
“(B) Provide assurance with respect to an obligation created by contract,
such as earnest money to ensure a transaction closes;
“(C) Settle an obligation that arises in the operation of a payment system,
securities settlement system, or other financial market infrastructure;
“(D) Provide assurance with respect to an obligation that arises in the
operation of a payment system, securities settlement system, or other financial market
infrastructure; or
“(E) Hold margin, other cash collateral, or funds that support the orderly
functioning of financial market infrastructure or the performance of an obligation with respect to
the infrastructure.
“(11) “Person” means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity,
government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity. The
term includes a protected series, however denominated, of an entity if the protected series is
established under law that limits, or limits if conditions specified under law are satisfied, the
ability of a creditor of the entity or of any other protected series of the entity to satisfy a claim
from assets of the protected series.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(12) “Record” means information:
“(A) Inscribed on a tangible medium; or
“(B) Stored in an electronic or other medium and retrievable in
perceivable form.
“(13) “Special deposit” means a deposit that satisfies the requirements set forth in
§ 28-2954.
“§ 28-2952. Scope; choice of law; forum.
“(a) This chapter applies to a special deposit under an account agreement that states the
intention of the parties to establish a special deposit governed by this chapter, regardless of
whether a party to the account agreement or a transaction related to the special deposit, or the
special deposit itself, has a reasonable relation to the District.
“(b) The parties to an account agreement may choose a forum in the District for settling a
dispute arising out of the special deposit, regardless of whether a party to the account agreement
or a transaction related to the special deposit, or the special deposit itself, has a reasonable
relation to the District.
“(c) This chapter does not affect:
“(1) A right or obligation relating to a deposit other than a special deposit under
this chapter; or
“(2) The voidability of a deposit or transfer that is fraudulent or voidable under
other law.
“§ 28-2953. Variation by agreement or amendment.
“(a) The effect of §§ 28-2951 through 28-2955, §§ 28-2957 through 28-2960, and § 28-
2963 may not be varied by agreement, except as provided in those sections. Subject to subsection
(b) of this section, the effect of §§ 28-2956, 28-2961, and 28-2962 may be varied by agreement.
“(b) A provision in an account agreement or other record that substantially excuses
liability or substantially limits remedies for failure to perform an obligation under this chapter is
not sufficient to vary the effect of a provision of this chapter.
“(c) If a beneficiary is a party to an account agreement, the bank and the depositor may
amend the agreement without the consent of the beneficiary only if the agreement expressly
permits the amendment.
“(d) If a beneficiary is not a party to an account agreement and the bank and the depositor
know the beneficiary has knowledge of the agreement’s terms, the bank and the depositor may
amend the agreement without the consent of the beneficiary only if the amendment does not
adversely and materially affect a payment right of the beneficiary.
“(e) If a beneficiary is not a party to an account agreement and the bank and the depositor
do not know whether the beneficiary has knowledge of the agreement’s terms, the bank and the
depositor may amend the agreement without the consent of the beneficiary only if the
amendment is made in good faith.
“§ 28-2954. Requirements for special deposit.
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“A deposit is a special deposit if it is:
“(1) A deposit of funds in a bank under an account agreement;
“(2) For the benefit of at least 2 beneficiaries, one or more of which may be a
depositor;
“(3) Denominated in a medium of exchange that is currently authorized or
adopted by a domestic or foreign government;
“(4) For a permissible purpose stated in the account agreement; and
“(5) Subject to a contingency.
“§ 28-2955. Permissible purpose.
“(a) A special deposit must serve at least one permissible purpose stated in the account
agreement from the time the special deposit is created in the account agreement until termination
of the special deposit.
“(b) If, before termination of the special deposit, the bank or a court determines the
special deposit no longer satisfies subsection (a) of this section, §§ 28-2957 through 28-2960
shall cease to apply to any funds deposited in the special deposit after the special deposit ceases
to satisfy subsection (a) of this section.
“(c) If, before termination of a special deposit, the bank determines the special deposit no
longer satisfies subsection (a) of this section, the bank may take action it believes is necessary
under the circumstances, including terminating the special deposit.
“§ 28-2956. Payment to beneficiary by bank.
“(a) Unless the account agreement provides otherwise, the bank is obligated to pay a
beneficiary if there are sufficient actually and finally collected funds in the balance of the special
deposit.
“(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the obligation to pay the
beneficiary is excused if the funds available in the special deposit are insufficient to cover such
payment.
“(c) Unless the account agreement provides otherwise, if the funds available in the
special deposit are insufficient to cover an obligation to pay a beneficiary, a beneficiary may
elect to be paid the funds that are available or, if there is more than one beneficiary, a pro rata
share of the funds available. Payment to the beneficiary making the election under this
subsection discharges the bank’s obligation to pay a beneficiary and does not constitute an
accord and satisfaction with respect to another person obligated to the beneficiary.
“(d) Unless the account agreement provides otherwise, the obligation of the bank
obligated to pay a beneficiary is immediately due and payable.
“(e) The bank may discharge its obligation under this section by:
“(1) Crediting another transaction account of the beneficiary; or
“(2) Taking other action that:
“(A) Is permitted under the account agreement for the bank to obtain a
discharge; or
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(B) Otherwise would constitute a discharge under law.
“(f) If the bank obligated to pay a beneficiary has incurred an obligation to discharge the
obligation of another person, the obligation of the other person is discharged if action by the
bank under subsection (e) of this section would constitute a discharge of the obligation of the
other person under law that determines whether an obligation is satisfied.
“§ 28-2957. Property interest of depositor or beneficiary.
“(a) Neither a depositor nor a beneficiary has a property interest in a special deposit.
“(b) Any property interest with respect to a special deposit is only in the right to receive
payment if the bank is obligated to pay a beneficiary and not in the special deposit itself. Any
property interest under this subsection is determined under other law.
“§ 28-2958. When creditor process enforceable against bank.
“(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, creditor process with respect to a special
deposit is not enforceable against the bank holding the special deposit.
“(b) Creditor process is enforceable against the bank holding a special deposit with
respect to an amount the bank is obligated to pay a beneficiary or a depositor if the process:
“(1) Is served on the bank;
“(2) Provides sufficient information to permit the bank to identify the depositor or
the beneficiary from the bank’s books and records; and
“(3) Gives the bank a reasonable opportunity to act on the process.
“(c) Creditor process served on a bank before it is enforceable against the bank under
subsection (b) of this section does not create a right of the creditor against the bank or a duty of
the bank to the creditor. Other law determines whether creditor process creates a lien enforceable
against the beneficiary on a contingent interest of a beneficiary, including a depositor as a
beneficiary, even if not enforceable against the bank.
“§ 28-2959. Injunction or similar relief.
“A court may enjoin, or grant similar relief that would have the effect of enjoining, a
bank from paying a depositor or beneficiary only if payment would constitute a material fraud or
facilitate a material fraud with respect to a special deposit.
“§ 28-2960. Recoupment or setoff.
“(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) or (c) of this section, a bank may not exercise a
right of recoupment or setoff against a special deposit.
“(b) An account agreement may authorize the bank to debit the special deposit:
“(1) When the bank becomes obligated to pay a beneficiary, in an amount that
does not exceed the amount necessary to discharge the obligation;
“(2) For a fee assessed by the bank that relates to an overdraft in the special
deposit account;
“(3) For costs incurred by the bank that relate directly to the special deposit; or
“(4) To reverse an earlier credit posted by the bank to the balance of the special
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
deposit account, if the reversal occurs under an event or circumstance warranted under other law
of the District governing mistake and restitution.
“(c) The bank holding a special deposit may exercise a right of recoupment or setoff
against an obligation to pay a beneficiary, even if the bank funds payment from the special
deposit.
“§ 28-2961. Duties and liability of bank.
“(a) A bank does not have a fiduciary duty to any person with respect to a special deposit.
“(b) When the bank holding a special deposit becomes obligated to pay a beneficiary, a
debtor-creditor relationship arises between the bank and beneficiary.
“(c) The bank holding a special deposit has a duty to a beneficiary to comply with the
account agreement and this chapter.
“(d) If the bank holding a special deposit does not comply with the account agreement or
this chapter, the bank is liable to a depositor or beneficiary only for damages proximately caused
by the noncompliance. Except as provided by other law of the District, the bank is not liable for
consequential, special, or punitive damages.
“(e) The bank holding a special deposit may rely on records presented in compliance with
the account agreement to determine whether the bank is obligated to pay a beneficiary.
“(f) If the account agreement requires payment on presentation of a record, the bank shall
determine within a reasonable time whether the record is sufficient to require payment. If the
agreement requires action by the bank on presentation of a record, the bank is not liable for
relying in good faith on the genuineness of the record if the record appears on its face to be
genuine.
“(g) Unless the account agreement provides otherwise, the bank is not required to
determine whether a permissible purpose stated in the agreement continues to exist.
“§ 28-2962. Term and termination.
“(a) Unless otherwise provided in the account agreement, a special deposit terminates 5
years after the date the special deposit was first funded.
“(b) Unless otherwise provided in the account agreement, if the bank cannot identify or
locate a beneficiary entitled to payment when the special deposit is terminated, and a balance
remains in the special deposit, the bank shall pay the balance to the depositor or depositors as a
beneficiary or beneficiaries.
“(c) A bank that pays the remaining balance as provided under subsection (b) of this
section has no further obligation with respect to the special deposit.
“§ 28-2963. Principles of law and equity.
“Subtitle I of this title, District consumer protection law, District laws governing deposits
generally, District law related to escheat and abandoned or unclaimed property, and the
principles of law and equity, including law related to capacity to contract, principal and agent,
estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, and bankruptcy, supplement this
chapter except to the extent inconsistent with this chapter.
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“§ 28-2964. Uniformity of application and construction.
“In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to
promote uniformity of the law among jurisdictions that enact it.
“§ 28- 2965. Transitional provision.
“This chapter applies to:
“(1) A special deposit made under an account agreement executed on or after the
effective date of this chapter; and
“(2) A deposit made under an agreement executed before the effective date of this
chapter, if:
“(A) All parties entitled to amend the agreement agree to make the deposit
a special deposit governed by this chapter; and
“(B) The special deposit referenced in the amended agreement satisfies §
28-2954.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
8